Washington statutes.
RCW 43.190.020

"Long-term care facility" defined.

As used in this chapter, "long-term care facility" means any of the following:

(1) A facility which:

(a) Maintains and operates twenty-four hour skilled nursing services for the care and treatment of chronically ill or convalescent patients, including mental, emotional, or behavioral problems, intellectual disabilities, or alcoholism;

(b) Provides supportive, restorative, and preventive health services in conjunction with a socially oriented program to its residents, and which maintains and operates twenty-four hour services including board, room, personal care, and intermittent nursing care. "Long-term health care facility" includes nursing homes and nursing facilities, but does not include acute care hospital or other licensed facilities except for that distinct part of the hospital or facility which provides nursing facility services.

(2) Any family home, group care facility, or similar facility determined by the secretary, for twenty-four hour nonmedical care of persons in need of personal services, supervision, or assistance essential for sustaining the activities of daily living or for the protection of the individual.

(3) Any swing bed in an acute care facility.

[ 2010 c 94 s 13; 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 32; 1991 sp.s. c 8 s 3; 1983 c 290 s 2.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2010 c 94: See note following RCW 44.04.280.

Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 18: See notes following RCW 74.39A.030.

Effective date—1991 sp.s. c 8: See note following RCW 18.51.050.